Hawaii statutes.
§431:5-203 Liabilities. In any
determination of the financial condition of an insurer, liabilities to be
charged against its assets shall include:

(1) The amount of its capital stock outstanding, if
any;

(2) The amount, estimated consistent with this article,
necessary to pay all of its unpaid losses and claims incurred on or prior to
the date of statement, whether reported or unreported, together with the
expense of adjustment or settlement thereof;

(3) With reference to life and accident and health or
sickness insurance, and annuity contracts:

(A) The amount of reserves on life insurance
policies and annuity contracts in force, valued according to the tables of
mortality, rates of interest, and methods adopted pursuant to this article
which are applicable thereto;

(B) Reserves for accident and health or
sickness benefits, for both active and disabled lives;

(C) Reserves for accidental death benefits;
and

(D) Any additional reserves which may be
required by the commissioner, consistent with practices adopted or approved by
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, on account of such
insurances;

(4) With reference to insurance other than those
specified in paragraph (3), the amount of reserves equal to the unearned
portions of the gross premiums charged on policies in force, computed in
accordance with this article;

(5) Taxes, expenses, and other obligations accrued at
the date of the statement; and

(6) Any additional reserve set up by the insurer for
a specific liability purpose or required by the commissioner consistent with
practices adopted or approved by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2003, c 212, §38]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next